Illinois, session 104th, SB3525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-1)8    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 9Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 10provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 11covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 12Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 13health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 14Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 15356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 16356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 17356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 18356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 19356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 20356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 21356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 22356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the 23Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must   SB3525- 2 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 2370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 3program of health benefits shall provide the coverage required 4under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance Code and, for the 5employees of the State Employee Group Insurance Program only, 6the coverage as also provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The 7Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 8Section with respect to Sections 370c and 370c.1 and Article 9XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code; all other requirements 10of this Section shall be enforced by the Department of Central 11Management Services.12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 22eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-27, eff. 241-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 251-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 26eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-19-25.)   SB3525- 3 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-1)2    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 3Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 4provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 7health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 8Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 9356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 10356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 11356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 12356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 13356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 14356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 15356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 16356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of 17the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 18must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 19370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 20Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 21coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 22Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 23Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 24Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 25enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to   SB3525- 4 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1Sections 370c and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois 2Insurance Code; all other requirements of this Section shall 3be enforced by the Department of Central Management Services.4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 15103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 167-1-27; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 171-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 19revised 11-19-25.) 20    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 21Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)23    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)24    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county,   SB3525- 5 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 2of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 3coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 4benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 5health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 6under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 7356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 8356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 9356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 10356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 11356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 12356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 13and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 14356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 15The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 16356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 17Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 18Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 19provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 20the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 21Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 22rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 23every provision of this Section. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 25any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   SB3525- 6 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 68-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 7eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 8103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 96-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 101-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 11eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-7-26.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)13    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 14including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 15of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 16coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 17benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 18health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 19under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 20356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 21356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 22356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 23356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 24356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 25356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74,   SB3525- 7 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 2356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 3The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 4356z.19, 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 5Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 6Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 7provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 8the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 9Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 10rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 11every provision of this Section. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 208-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 21eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 22103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 236-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 241-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 25eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 26revised 1-7-26.)   SB3525- 8 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 2changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 3    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)5    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 6municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 7self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 8coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 9coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 12356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 13356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 14356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 15356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 16356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 17356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 18356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 19356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 20356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 22and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 23Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 24requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in   SB3525- 9 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1this Section is an exclusive power and function of the State 2and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, 3subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule 4municipality to which this Section applies must comply with 5every provision of this Section. 6    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 7any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 8with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 9Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 10Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 11whatever reason, is unauthorized. 12(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 148-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 15eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 176-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 181-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 19eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-8-26.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)21    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 22municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 23self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 24coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 25coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be   SB3525- 10 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 2Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 3356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 4356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 5356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 6356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 7356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 8356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 9356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 10356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 11356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 12coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 13370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 14Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 15Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 16provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 17the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 18Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 19rule municipality to which this Section applies must comply 20with every provision of this Section. 21    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 22any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 23with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 24Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 25Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 26whatever reason, is unauthorized.   SB3525- 11 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 38-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 4eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 66-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 71-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 8eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 9revised 1-8-26.) 10    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1110-22.3f as follows: 12    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)14    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 15protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 16post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 17policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 18the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 19356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 20356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 21356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 22356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 23356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 24356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71,   SB3525- 12 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 2356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois 3Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 4356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 5comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c and Article 6XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 7Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 8    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 9any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 10with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 11Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 12Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 13whatever reason, is unauthorized. 14(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 168-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 17eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 18103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 196-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 201-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 21eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 22revised 1-8-26.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)24    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 25protection and benefits for employees shall provide the   SB3525- 13 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 2policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 3the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 4356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 5356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 6356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 7356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 8356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 9356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 10356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 11356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois 12Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 13356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 14comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 370c, and 370c.4 and 15Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department 16of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 17    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 18any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 19with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 20Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 21Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 22whatever reason, is unauthorized. 23(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 258-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 26eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   SB3525- 14 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 26-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 31-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 4eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 5104-446, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-8-26.) 6    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 7adding Section 356z.88 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)9    Sec. 356z.88. Coverage for prescription hormone therapy.10    (a) For purposes of this Section, "prescription hormone 11therapy" means all drugs approved by the United States Food 12and Drug Administration that are used to medically suppress, 13increase, or replace hormones that the body is not producing 14at intended levels and the necessary supplies for 15self-administration. "Prescription hormone therapy" does not 16include glucagon-like peptide-1 and glucagon-like peptide-1 17receptor agonists. 18    (b)(1) An individual or group policy of accident and 19health insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed in 20this State on or after the effective date of this amendatory 21Act of the 104th General Assembly shall provide coverage for 22up to a 12-month supply of prescription hormone therapy, and 23the necessary supplies for self-administration, that is 24prescribed by a network provider within the provider's scope   SB3525- 15 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1of practice and dispensed at one time for an enrollee by a 2provider or pharmacist, or at a location licensed or otherwise 3authorized to dispense drugs or supplies.4    (2) This Section does not require an individual or group 5policy of accident and health insurance amended, delivered, 6issued, or renewed in this State on or after the effective date 7of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly to cover 8prescription hormone therapy provided by an out-of-network 9provider, pharmacy, or location licensed or otherwise 10authorized to dispense drugs or supplies, except as may 11otherwise be authorized by State or federal law or by the 12plan's policies governing out-of-network coverage. If 13prescriptions for medically necessary prescription hormone 14therapy are unavailable to a plan enrollee within the plan's 15network, the plan shall arrange for the prescription hormone 16therapy to be provided by an out-of-network provider.17    (3) This Section does not prohibit an individual or group 18policy of accident and health insurance amended, delivered, 19issued, or renewed in this State on or after the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly from 21limiting refills that may be obtained in the last quarter of 22the plan year if a 12-month supply of the prescription hormone 23therapy has already been dispensed during the plan year.24    (4) This Section does not require a provider to prescribe, 25furnish, or dispense 12 months of prescription hormone therapy 26at one time.  SB3525- 16 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    (5) To the extent not otherwise prohibited under this 2Section or State or federal law, health plans may apply drug 3utilization management strategies to prescription drugs 4covered under paragraph (1) of this subsection. 5    (6) If an individual or group policy of accident and 6health insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed in 7this State on or after the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of the 104th General Assembly delegates responsibilities 9under this Section to a contracted entity, including a medical 10group or independent practice association, the delegated 11entity shall comply with this Section. 12    (c) This Section does not deny or restrict the 13Department's authority to ensure plan compliance when an 14individual or group policy of accident and health insurance 15amended, delivered, issued, or renewed in this State on or 16after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 17General Assembly provides coverage for prescription hormone 18therapy.  19    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 20amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 21    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)22    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 23    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 24the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140,   SB3525- 17 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 2152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 3155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 4356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 5356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 6356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 7356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 8356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 9356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 10356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 11356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 13356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 14356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 15356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 16356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 17367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 18370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, 19and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and 20Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, 21XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.22    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 23for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 24Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 25are deemed to be "domestic companies":26        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service   SB3525- 18 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;2        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 3    State; or4        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 5    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 6    of this State, except a corporation subject to 7    substantially the same requirements in its state of 8    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 9    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.10    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 11acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 12pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,13        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 14    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 15    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 16    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 17    acquisition of control takes effect;18        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 19    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 20    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 21    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 22    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 23    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 24    other acquisition of control;25        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 26    following information:  SB3525- 19 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 2        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 3        Organization sought to be acquired;4            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 5        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 6        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 7        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 8        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 9        forma financial statements reflecting projected 10        combined operation for a period of 2 years;11            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 12        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 13        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 14        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and15            (D) such other information as the Director shall 16        require.17    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 18Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 19any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 20enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 21maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 22to its health care certificates).23    (e) In considering any management contract or service 24agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 25Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 26specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,   SB3525- 20 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1take into account the effect of the management contract or 2service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 3and the financial condition of the health maintenance 4organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 5into account the effect of the management contract or service 6agreement on competition.7    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 8Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 9Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 10defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 11Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 12group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 13additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:14        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 15    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 16    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 17    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 18    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 19    not be less than one year); and20        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 21    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 22    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 23    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 24    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 25    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 26    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the   SB3525- 21 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 2    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 3    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 4    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 5    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 6    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 7    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 8    plan years.9    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 10statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 11describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 12and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 13the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 14to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 15profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 16unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 17or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 18experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 19the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 20enrollment unit.21    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 22Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 23contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 24refund authorized under this Section.25    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 26if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in   SB3525- 22 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 2Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 3Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 4adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 71-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 8eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 101-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 11eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 12103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 131-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 14eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 15eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 16104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff. 171-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 18    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 19amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 20    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)21    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 22health service organizations shall be subject to the 23provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 24141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153,   SB3525- 23 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 2355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 3356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 4356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 5356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 6356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 7356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 8403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and Articles 9IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 10XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 11shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 12that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 13Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 14Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 15organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 16domestic companies:17        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or18        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 19    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 20    of this State, except a corporation subject to 21    substantially the same requirements in its state of 22    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 23    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.24(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 261-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656,   SB3525- 24 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 2103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 31-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 4eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 5104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 68-15-25; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 711-21-25.) 8    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 9amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)11    Sec. 10. Application of Illinois Insurance Code 12provisions. Health services plan corporations and all persons 13interested therein or dealing therewith shall be subject to 14the provisions of Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 15133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 16354, 355.2, 355.3, 355.7, 355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 17356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 18356z.1, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 19356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 20356z.15, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 21356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 22356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 23356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 24356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.79,   SB3525- 25 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.01, 2364.3, 367.2, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 3408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of 4the Illinois Insurance Code.5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 138-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, 14eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 15103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 161-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, 17eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 19104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 208-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 21    Section 45. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by adding 22Section 45 as follows: 23    (225 ILCS 85/45 new)24    Sec. 45. Prescription hormone therapy.   SB3525- 26 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    (a) For purposes of this Section, "prescription hormone 2therapy" means all drugs approved by the United States Food 3and Drug Administration that are used to medically suppress, 4increase, or replace hormones that the body is not producing 5at intended levels and the necessary supplies for 6self-administration. "Prescription hormone therapy" does not 7include glucagon-like peptide-1 and glucagon-like peptide-1 8receptor agonists. 9    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 10dispensing provider or pharmacist shall dispense, at a 11patient's request, up to a 12-month supply of a prescription 12hormone therapy and the necessary supplies for 13self-administration pursuant to a valid prescription that 14specifies an initial quantity followed by periodic refills, 15unless any of the following is true:16        (1) The patient requests a smaller supply.17        (2) The prescribing provider instructs that the 18    patient must have a smaller supply.19        (3) The prescribing provider temporarily limits 20    refills to a 90-day supply due to an acute dispensing 21    shortage, so long as those limits are rescinded at the 22    first opportunity of a regularly reinstated, sustainable 23    supply.24        (4) The prescription hormone therapy is a controlled 25    substance. If the prescription hormone therapy is a 26    controlled substance, the pharmacist shall dispense the   SB3525- 27 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1    maximum supply allowed under State and federal law to be 2    obtained at one time by the patient.  3    Section 50. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 4changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 5    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)6    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 7assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 8benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 9health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 10under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 11356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 12356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.71, and 356z.75, and 356z.80, 356z.84, 356z.85, 14and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to 15the provisions of Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 16370c, and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be 17subject to the provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of 18the Network Adequacy and Transparency Act.19    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 20the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 21Code. 22    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 23rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 24any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate   SB3525- 28 -LRB104 19064 BAB 32509 b1of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 2with Section 5-5e. 3    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 4Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 5ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 6post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 7no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 8(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 9103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, eff. 101-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-73, 11eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 12104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 13    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 14changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 15that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 16represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 17not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 18made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 19Public Act.